Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB379.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1302 and 1502 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 1302. Vehicles exempt from registration.The following types of vehicles are exempt from registration:* * *(2.3) Any implement of husbandry, trailer or semitrailer used for agricultural operations and operated by an individual upon highways between a farm that is the individual's residence and a school that is hosting an annual agriculture-related educational event for the purpose of participating in that event, provided that the distance 123456789101112131415161718 between the individual's residence and the site of the event does not exceed 25 miles.* * *§ 1502. Persons exempt from licensing.The following persons are not required to obtain a driver's license under this chapter:* * *(6) Any individual 14 years of age or older may operate an implement of husbandry, trailer or semitrailer not to exceed 11 feet in width on a roadway for the purpose of driving that implement between sunrise and sunset to an annual agriculture-related educational event hosted by a school, provided that the distance between the individual's residence and the site of the event does not exceed 25 miles. Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0379PN0335 - 2 - 123456789101112131415